District of Columbia statutes.
50-2205.03

Repealed

Admissibility of test results.

Repealed.

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 3, 29 DCR 3138
Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-174, § 6, 29 DCR 5753
May 5, 1992, D.C. Law 9-96, § 2(b), 38 DCR 7274
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 103(e)(2)(B), 59 DCR 12957
Alcoholic beverage control, preliminary alcohol breath test results, admissibility, see § 25-1006.
1981 Ed., § 40-717.2.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 103(e)(2)(B) of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 103(e)(2)(B) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 103(e)(2)(B) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 103(e)(2)(B) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
Mayor authorized to issue rules: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-2205.02.